verbo/espanol_verbo_pres_subj.foma
define PresSubjYo1 [a r "&"] -> {e} || _ 1;
define PresSubjTu1 [a r "&"] -> {es} || _ 2;
define PresSubjElla1 [a r "&"] -> {e} || _ 3;
define PresSubjNos1 [a r "&"] -> {emos} || _ 4;
define PresSubjVos1 [a r "&"] -> {éis} || _ 5;
define PresSubjUst1 [a r "&"] -> {en} || _ 6;

define PresSubjYo2 [e r "&"] -> {a} || _ 1;
define PresSubjTu2 [e r "&"] -> {as} || _ 2;
define PresSubjElla2 [e r "&"] -> {a} || _ 3;
define PresSubjNos2 [e r "&"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define PresSubjVos2 [e r "&"] -> {áis} || _ 5;
define PresSubjUst2 [e r "&"] -> {an} || _ 6;

define PresSubjYo3 [i r "&"] -> {a} || _ 1;
define PresSubjTu3 [i r "&"] -> {as} || _ 2;
define PresSubjElla3 [i r "&"] -> {a} || _ 3;
define PresSubjNos3 [i r "&"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define PresSubjVos3 [i r "&"] -> {áis} || _ 5;
define PresSubjUst3 [i r "&"] -> {an} || _ 6;

define PresSubj1 PresSubjYo1 .o. PresSubjTu1 .o. PresSubjElla1 .o. PresSubjNos1 .o. PresSubjVos1 .o. PresSubjUst1;
define PresSubj2 PresSubjYo2 .o. PresSubjTu2 .o. PresSubjElla2 .o. PresSubjNos2 .o. PresSubjVos2 .o. PresSubjUst2;
define PresSubj3 PresSubjYo3 .o. PresSubjTu3 .o. PresSubjElla3 .o. PresSubjNos3 .o. PresSubjVos3 .o. PresSubjUst3;

define PresSubj PresSubj1 .o. PresSubj2 .o. PresSubj3;
